Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.430

Administrator's examination—Certificate—Administrator's requirements.

(1) Each applicant for a telecommunications contractor license shall designate a supervisory employee or member of the firm to take the administrator's examination. This person shall be designated as administrator under the contractor's license and must be a full-time supervisory employee of the applicant. No person may qualify as administrator for more than one contractor. If the relationship of the administrator with the telecommunications contractor is terminated, the contractor's license is void within ninety days unless another administrator is qualified by the board. However, if the administrator dies, the contractor's license is void within one hundred eighty days unless another administrator is qualified by the board.

(2) A certificate issued under this section is valid for two years from the nearest birthdate of the administrator, unless revoked or suspended, and is nontransferable. The certificate may be renewed for a two-year period without examination by appropriate application unless the certificate has been revoked, suspended, or not renewed within ninety days after the expiration date. If the certificate is not renewed before the expiration date, the individual shall pay twice the usual fee. A person may take the administrator's test as many times as necessary to pass, without limit.

(3) The administrator shall:

(a) Be a member of the firm or a supervisory employee and shall be available during working hours to carry out the duties of an administrator under this section;

(b) Ensure that all telecommunications work complies with the telecommunication[s] installation laws and rules;

(c) Ensure proper permits are required and inspections made;

(d) See that corrective notices issued by an inspecting authority are complied with; and

(e) Notify the department in writing within ten days if the administrator relationship is terminated with the telecommunications contractor.

[ 2000 c 238 s 207.]

NOTES:

Severability—2000 c 238: See note following RCW 19.28.301.